Massachusetts, session 194th, H498.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following subsection
in Section 16G:-
(o) The secretary of economic development shall, in consultation with the Rural Policy
Advisory Commission, establish a rural development initiative to be administered by the
executive office through a contract with the Massachusetts Development Finance Agency
established by section 2 of chapter 23G. The initiative will provide technical assistance to
identify and implement strategies that will spur direct investment in rural communities to create
jobs and expand businesses, identify cross-sector partnerships, accelerate the engagement of
of 2

community members in actionable planning, and implement local economic development
initiatives.
of 2